Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1074
Public safety answering point; compensation for costs.

(1) A public safety answering point may be compensated for costs determined by the commission to be eligible for funding. The level of funding available to each public safety answering point for eligible cost compensation may be limited by the commission. The commission is not required to provide compensation for costs to more than one public safety answering point in any county. A public safety answering point may apply for disbursement from the 911 Service System Fund by submitting a written application to the commission. The commission shall receive and review applications, including supporting documentation. The commission shall notify each applicant as to the commission's approval or disapproval of the application.

(2) Each entity that receives disbursements from the 911 Service System Fund shall make a full accounting of the money in a manner and form prescribed by the commission.

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2211;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 267;

Laws 2006, LB 1222, § 12;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-466;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 56.